Washington statutes.
RCW 2.50.120

County funds.

The county board in its discretion shall allocate funds for the purposes of the bureau from county funds available for public assistance and relief received from the levy of three mills as provided in section 17, chapter 180, Laws of 1937.

[ 1939 c 93 s 12; RRS s 10007-212. Formerly RCW 74.36.120.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: 1937 c 180 s 17 was repealed by 1939 c 216 s 35.